Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 22. Virginia Caregivers Grant Program.

§ 63.2-2200.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Activities of daily living”
or

“ADLs”

means bathing, dressing, toileting, transferring, bowel control, bladder control, and eating/feeding.

“Assistance”
means aid that is required to be provided by another person in order to safely complete the activity.

“Care for a mentally or physically impaired person”
means assistance with the activities of daily living provided to such person when the person has been screened and has been found to be eligible, in accordance with relevant state regulations, for placement and Medicaid reimbursement for services in an assisted-living facility or a nursing home or for receiving community-based long-term care services.

“Caregiver”
means an adult who is a single person with a Virginia adjusted gross income of not more than $50,000, or married and the combined Virginia adjusted gross income of both spouses is not more than $75,000 who provides care for a mentally or physically impaired person within the Commonwealth. A caregiver shall be either related by blood, marriage, or adoption to, or the legally appointed guardian of, the mentally or physically impaired person for whom he is caring.

“Fund”
means the Virginia Caregivers Grant Fund established by §

63.2-2202

.

“Mentally or physically impaired person”
means a person who is a resident of Virginia that requires assistance with two or more activities of daily living during more than half the year.

History.

1999, cc. 737, 763, § 63.1-331; 2002, c. 747; 2007, c. 588.

Cross references.

As to zoning provisions for temporary family health care structures, see §

15.2-2292.1

.

Effective date.

This title became effective October 1, 2002.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 588 in the definition of “Care for a mentally or physically impaired person” substituted “person” for “relative”
three times; in the definition of “Caregiver” inserted “who is a single person” and “or married and the combined Virginia adjusted gross income of both spouses is not more than $75,000,” substituted “person” for “relative” and added the last sentence; substituted “person” for “relative” twice in the definition of “Mentally or physically impaired person”; and deleted the definiton of “Relative,” which read: “ ‘Relative’ means a spouse, child, father, mother, sibling, or other person who is related by blood, marriage or adoption.”

§ 63.2-2201.
Caregivers Grant Program established.

From January 1, 2000, through December 31, 2010, any caregiver who provides care for a mentally or physically impaired person shall be eligible to receive an annual caregivers grant in the amount of $500. The grants under this chapter shall be paid from the Fund, as provided in this chapter, to the caregiver during the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the care for a mentally or physically impaired person was provided. The total amount of grants to be paid under this chapter for any year shall not exceed the amount appropriated by the General Assembly to the Fund for payment to caregivers for such year.

Only one grant shall be allowed annually for each mentally or physically impaired person receiving care under the provisions of this section. Multiple caregivers providing care to the same mentally or physically impaired person shall be eligible to share the $500 grant as mutually agreed. However, only one caregiver may submit a grant application for the person. A caregiver providing care to more than one eligible person shall submit a separate grant application for each person receiving care.

The mentally or physically impaired person being cared for may live in the caregiver’s home or in his own home but shall not be receiving Medicaid-reimbursed community long-term care services, other than on a temporary or periodic basis, or living in a nursing home or other assisted living facility where assistance with ADLs is already provided and the cost of such assistance is included in the monthly bill or rental fee.

History.

1999, cc. 737, 763, § 63.1-332; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 31; 2007, c. 588.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 31 substituted “December 31, 2010” for “December 31, 2005” in the introductory language of subsection A.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 588 substituted “person” for “relative” throughout this section.

§ 63.2-2202.
Virginia Caregivers Grant Fund established.

There is hereby established a special fund in the state treasury to be known as the Virginia Caregivers Grant Fund, which shall be administered by the Department. The Fund shall include such moneys as may be appropriated by the General Assembly from time to time and designated for the Fund. The Fund shall be used solely for the payment of grants to caregivers pursuant to this chapter. Unallocated moneys in the Fund in any year shall remain in the Fund and be available for allocation for grants under this chapter in ensuing fiscal years.

History.

1999, cc. 737, 763, § 63.1-333; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to voluntary contributions of tax refunds, see §

58.1-344.3

.

§ 63.2-2203.
Grant application process; administration.

Grant applications shall be submitted by caregivers to the Department between February 1 and May 1 of the year following the calendar year in which the care for a mentally or physically impaired person was provided. Failure to meet the application deadline shall render the caregiver ineligible to receive a grant for care provided during such calendar year. For filings by mail, the postmark cancellation shall govern the date of the filing determination.

Applications for grants shall include (i) proof of the caregiver’s income and that of the caregiver’s spouse, if applicable; (ii) certification by the private physician, licensed physician assistant pursuant to §

54.1-2951.2

, or nurse practitioner pursuant to §

54.1-2957.02

who has screened the mentally or physically impaired person and found him to be eligible, in accordance with relevant state regulations, for placement in an assisted-living facility or a nursing home or for receiving community long-term care services; (iii) the mentally or physically impaired person’s place of residence; and (iv) such other relevant information as the Department may reasonably require. Any caregiver applying for the grant pursuant to this chapter shall affirm, by signing and submitting his application for a grant, that the mentally or physically impaired person for whom he provided care and the care provided meet the criteria set forth in this chapter. As a condition of receipt of a grant, a caregiver shall agree to make available to the Department for inspection, upon request, all relevant and applicable documents to determine whether the caregiver meets the requirements for the receipt of grants as set forth in this chapter, and to consent to the use by the Department of all relevant information relating to eligibility for the requested grant.

The Department shall review applications for grants and determine eligibility and the amount of the grant to be allocated to each eligible caregiver. If the moneys in the Fund are less than the amount of grants to which applicants are eligible for caregiver services provided in the preceding calendar year, the moneys in the Fund shall be apportioned among eligible applicants pro rata, based upon the amount of the grant for which an applicant is eligible and the amount of money in the Fund.

The Department shall certify to the Comptroller the amount of grant to be allocated to eligible caregiver applicants. Payments shall be made by check issued by the State Treasurer on warrant of the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall not draw any warrants to issue checks for this program without a specific legislative appropriation as specified in conditions and restrictions on expenditures in the appropriation act.

Actions of the Department relating to the review, allocation and awarding of grants shall be exempt from the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) pursuant to subdivision B 4 of §

2.2-4002

. Decisions of the Department shall be final and not subject to review or appeal.

History.

1999, cc. 737, 763, § 63.1-334; 2002, cc. 41, 747; 2007, c. 588; 2008, c. 507.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 41 amended § 63.1-334, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 41 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 41, in subsection C, inserted “eligibility and” and “eligible” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence which read: “The Department shall allocate moneys in the following order of priority: (i) first, to unpaid grant amounts carried forward from prior years because caregivers did not receive the full amount of any grant to which they were eligible in a prior year and (ii) then to other eligible applicants,” in the present second sentence, deleted “in any class of priority” following “which applicants,” inserted “for caregiver services provided in the preceding calendar year,”deleted “in such class” following “eligible applicants” and deleted “available for allocation to such class” following “money in the Fund”; deleted former subsection D which read: “If a caregiver is allocated less than the full amount of a grant for which he is eligible in any year, the caregiver shall not be eligible for the deficiency in that year, but the unpaid portion of the grant to which the caregiver was eligible shall be carried forward by the Department to the following year, during which it shall be in the first class of priority as provided in subsection C. A caregiver shall have no claim against the Commonwealth with respect to any grant authorized by this chapter”; and redesignated former subsections E and F as present subsections D and E.

Acts 2002, c. 41, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall be applicable to caregiver services provided in calendar year 2002 for which grant applications are required to be submitted in 2003.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 588, in subsection B, substituted “person” for “relative” throughout this section; inserted “and that of the caregiver’s spouse, if applicable” at the end of clause (i) and substituted “person’s” for “relative’s” in clause (iii).

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 507 inserted “licensed physician assistant pursuant to §

54.1-2951.2

, or nurse practitioner pursuant to §

54.1-2957.02

” in clause (ii) of subsection B.

§ 63.2-2204.
Confidentiality of information.

Except in accordance with proper judicial order or as otherwise provided by law, any employee or former employee of the Department shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performance of his duties with respect to the income or grant eligibility of any caregiver submitted pursuant to this chapter. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to (i) acts performed or words spoken or published in the line of duty under law; (ii) inquiries and investigations to obtain information as to the implementation of this chapter by a duly constituted committee of the General Assembly, or when such inquiry or investigation is relevant to its study, provided that any such information shall be privileged; or (iii) the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of particular caregivers.

History.

1999, cc. 737, 763, § 63.1-335; 2002, c. 747.